Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Chapter 7.1. Health Statistics.

§ 32.1-276.1.
Center for Health Statistics; duties of Director.

The Board shall provide a Center for Health Statistics to perform data program development, reporting, systems operations, analysis and consultation, for the Department of Health, for county and city departments of health and other public agencies having health-related duties.

The Director of the Center for Health Statistics, under the supervision of the Commissioner, shall:

Supervise the Center for Health Statistics.

Collect other health-related records and reports and prepare, tabulate, analyze, and publish vital statistics and other health statistical data of this Commonwealth and such other reports as may be required by the Commissioner or the Board.

History.

1983, c. 240.